Massachusetts, session 194th, H3366.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 15ZZZZZZ, the following section:-
Section 15AAAAAAA. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart
April 5 as Okur-Chung Neurodevelopmental Syndrome (OCNDS) Awareness Day, to raise
awareness of this rare genetic disorder caused by heterozygous mutations in the CSNK2A1 gene
on chromosome 20 and manifesting as developmental delay or differences in brain function,
which can be managed with early therapy, and recommending that the day be observed in an
appropriate manner by the people.
of 1